Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1374XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1374XD (4) 91
cm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 602.1501, Code 2025, is amended by
striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
602.1501 Judicial officer salaries.
1. A salary rate specified in subsection 2 takes effect at
the start of the pay period in which the applicable fiscal year
begins. The salaries provided for in this section shall be
paid from moneys appropriated to the judicial branch.
2. a. (1) Each district judge except the chief judge of
a judicial district shall receive an annual salary equal to a
specified percentage of the annual rate of compensation for a
district judge of the United States in effect at the beginning
of the applicable state fiscal year, as follows:
(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, seventy-one
percent.
(b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, seventy-two
and thirty-three hundredths percent.
(c) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027,
seventy-three and sixty-six hundredths percent.
(2) This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2028.
b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, and adjusted
for each fiscal year thereafter, each district judge except
the chief judge of a judicial district shall receive an annual
salary equal to seventy-five percent of the annual rate of
compensation for a district judge of the United States in
effect at the beginning of the applicable state fiscal year.
c. The following judicial officer salaries shall be
calculated as a percentage of the state district judge salary
for a given fiscal year as specified in this subsection, as
follows:
(1) For the chief justice of the supreme court, one hundred
twenty-four percent.
(2) For each justice of the supreme court except the chief
justice, one hundred nineteen percent.
(3) For the chief judge of the court of appeals, one hundred
LSB 1374XD (4) 91
-1- cm/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
eleven percent.
(4) For each judge of the court of appeals except the chief
judge of the court of appeals, one hundred seven percent.
(5) For each chief judge of a judicial district, one hundred
four percent.
(6) For each district associate judge, associate juvenile
judge, and associate probate judge, eighty-nine percent.
(7) For each magistrate, twenty-seven percent, subject to
section 602.6402.
(8) For each senior judge, six percent.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, if the supreme court
determines that appropriations to the judicial branch for
a given fiscal year are insufficient to provide the full
allowable judicial officer salaries set forth in subsection
2 or other good cause exists, the supreme court may provide
judicial officers a lower annual salary.
Sec. 2. Section 602.9104, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. A judge to whom this article applies shall be paid
an amount equal to the basic salary of the judge as set by
the general assembly section 602.1501, reduced by an amount
designated as the judge’s required contribution to the judicial
retirement fund. The amount designated as the judge’s required
contribution shall be paid by the state in the manner provided
in subsection 2.
Sec. 3. Section 602.9204, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. A judge who retires on or after July 1, 1994, and who is
appointed a senior judge under section 602.9203 shall be paid a
salary as determined by the general assembly section 602.1501.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect June 20,
2025.